Montana, session 2025, LC0304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 8], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "All-or-nothing clause" means a provision of a health care contract that:
(a) requires the health carrier or health plan administrator to include all members of a health care
provider in a network plan; or
(b) requires the health carrier or health plan administrator to enter into any additional contracts with
an affiliate of the health care provider as a condition of entering into a contract with the health care provider.
(2) "All-products clause" means a provision in a health care contract that requires a health care
provider, as a condition of participation or continuation in a provider network or a health benefit plan, to:
(a) serve in another provider network utilized by a health carrier, subcontractor, or affiliate with
different reimbursement rates and other financial terms for the health care provider; or
(b) provide health care services under another health benefit plan or product offered by a health
carrier, subcontractor, or affiliate with different reimbursement rates and other financial terms for the health care
provider.
(3) "Anti-steering clause" means a provision of a health care contract that restricts the ability of the
health carrier or health plan administrator to encourage an enrollee to obtain a health care service from a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
competitor of the hospital or health system, including offering incentives to encourage enrollees to utilize
specific health care providers.
(4) "Anti-tiering clause" means a provision in a health care contract that:
(a) restricts the ability of the health carrier or health plan administrator to introduce or modify a
tiered network plan or assign health care providers into tiers; or
(b) requires the health carrier or health plan administrator to place all members of a health care
provider in the same tier of a tiered network plan.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of insurance of the state of Montana.
(6) "Department" means the department of justice provided for in 2-15-2001.
(7) "Enrollee" has the same meaning as provided in 33-1-801.
(8) "Gag clause" means a provision of a health care contract that:
(a) restricts the ability of the health carrier, the health plan administrator, or the provider to disclose
any price or quality information, including the allowed amount, negotiated rates or discounts, any fees for
services, or any other claim-related financial obligations included in the provider contract, to a government
entity as authorized by law or its contractors or agents or any enrollee, treating provider of an enrollee, plan
sponsor, or potential eligible enrollees and plan sponsors; or
(b) restricts the ability of the health carrier, the health plan administrator, or the provider, including
a pharmacist, to disclose out-of-pocket costs or that restricts a provider or pharmacist from disclosing lower
cost options to an enrollee.
(9) "Health benefit plan" means a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement that is entered into,
offered, or issued by a health carrier to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of
health care services, including medical care, dental care, and vision care.
(10) "Health care contract" means a contract, agreement, or understanding, either orally or in
writing, that is entered into, amended, restated, or renewed between a health care provider and a health carrier,
health plan administrator, or plan sponsor, or its contractors or agents, for the delivery of health care services to
an enrollee of a health benefit plan.
(11) "Health care provider" means an entity, corporation, or organization or a parent corporation,
member, affiliate, subsidiary, or entity under common ownership, whether for profit or nonprofit, that is or whose
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
members are licensed or otherwise authorized by the state to furnish, bill, or receive payment for health care
service delivery in the normal course of business. The term includes, without limitation, health systems,
hospitals, hospital-based facilities, freestanding emergency facilities, imaging centers, large physician groups
with eight or more physicians, physician staffing organizations, and urgent care clinics.
(12) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as provided in 33-1-801.
(13) "Health plan administrator" means a third-party administrator who acts on behalf of a plan
sponsor to administer a health benefit plan.
(14) "Most-favored-nations clause" means a provision of a health care contract that:
(a) prohibits or grants a health carrier or health plan administrator an option to prohibit a
participating health care provider from contracting with another contracting entity to provide health care services
at the same or lower price than the payment specified in the health care contract;
(b) requires or grants a health carrier or health plan administrator an option to require a
participating health care provider to accept a lower payment in the event the participating health care provider
agrees to provide health care services to another contracting entity at a lower price;
(c) requires or grants a health carrier or health plan administrator an option to require termination
or renegotiation of an existing health care contract if a participating health care provider agrees to provide
health care services to another contracting entity at the same or lower price; or
(d) restricts other health carriers or health plan administrators not party to the contract from paying
the same or lower rates for items or services than the contracting health carrier or health plan administrator
pays for such items or services.
(15) "Network plan" means a health benefit plan that either requires enrollees to use or creates
incentives, including financial incentives, for enrollees to use certain health care providers managed, owned,
affiliated, under contract with, or employed by a health carrier, a health plan administrator, or a plan sponsor.
Network plans include health maintenance organization plans, preferred provider organization plans, and
exclusive provider organization plans.
(16) "Tiered network plan" means a health benefit plan that sorts some or all types of health care
providers into specific groups to which different provider reimbursement, enrollee cost sharing, or provider
access requirements, or any combination of those, are applied for the same services.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Limitations on anticompetitive health care contract terms. (1) Except
as provided in [section 3], a health carrier, a health care provider, a health plan administrator, or an agent or
other entity that contracts on behalf of a health care provider, health carrier, or health plan administrator may
not offer, solicit, request, amend, renew, or enter into a health care contract that directly or indirectly includes
any of the following provisions:
(a) a most-favored-nations clause;
(b) an anti-steering clause;
(c) an anti-tiering clause;
(d) an all-or-nothing clause;
(e) a gag clause;
(f) an all-products clause; or
(g) any other clause that results or intends to result in anticompetitive effects as specified by the
department through administrative rule.
(2) Except as provided in [section 3], a violation of [sections 1 through 8] constitutes an unfair or
deceptive act under 30-14-103 and is presumptively unlawful, subject to enforcement by the department.
(3) A prohibition on all-products clauses does not prevent a contracting entity from:
(a) offering a health care provider a contract that covers multiple health benefit plans that have the
same reimbursement rates and other financial terms for the health care provider;
(b) adding a new health benefit plan to an existing health care contract with a health care provider
under the same reimbursement rates and other financial terms applicable under the original health care
contract;
(c) requiring a health care provider to accept multiple health benefit plans that do not differ in
reimbursement rates or other financial terms for the health care provider; or
(d) offering a health care provider a contract for another health benefit plan with different
reimbursement rates or financial terms as long as participation in one plan is not conditional on participation in
the other plan.
(4) A health care contract may include health benefit plans or coverage options for enrollees within
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
a health benefit plan with different cost-sharing structures, including different deductibles or copayments, as
long as the reimbursement rates and other financial terms between the contracting entity and the health care
provider remain the same for each plan or coverage option included in the health care contract.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Application for waiver -- severability. (1) A party to a health care
contract that contains a provision specified in [section 2(1)] may submit the health care contract to the
department for a waiver. The health care contract must be accompanied by the following information:
(a) the name and business address of each party to the health care contract;
(b) an identification of each location at which any party to the agreement or policy provides health
care services; and
(c) any information required to demonstrate that the proposed agreement or policy results in an
increase in the welfare of consumers in the state that could not have been accomplished through alternative
means that are less restrictive.
(2) The department shall approve or deny a waiver application in writing within 60 days of receiving
the application.
(3) The department may approve a waiver to allow a contract to include a provision specified in
[section 2(1)] only if the department determines:
(a) the agreement or policy will result in an increase in the welfare of consumers in the state in a
way that ensures the procompetitive justifications of including the provision outweigh the harms to competition;
(b) an increase in the welfare of consumers in the state could not have been accomplished
through alternative means that are less restrictive; and
(c) the agreement or policy does not otherwise constitute a contract, combination, or conspiracy in
restraint of trade under state or federal antitrust laws.
(4) Except for contracts granted a waiver under this section by the department, any provision of a
health care contract described in [section 2(1)] that violates [sections 1 through 8] is null and void and
unenforceable. The remaining provisions of the health care contract, excluding any provision in violation of
[sections 1 through 8], remain in effect and are enforceable.

- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Enforcement by department -- penalties -- equitable relief. (1) The
department may use authority granted to it by Title 30, chapter 14, part 1, to enforce any provision of [sections
1 through 8] or to investigate suspected violations of any provision of [sections 1 through 8].
(2) The department may institute proceedings on behalf of the state or on behalf of the persons
residing in the state for:
(a) injunctive relief under 30-14-111 to prevent and restrain a violation of any provision of this
chapter including, without limitation, a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent
injunction;
(b) civil penalties under 30-14-142 for violations of any provision of [sections 1 through 8]; and
(c) other equitable relief for violations of any provision of [sections 1 through 8] including, without
limitation, disgorgement or restitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Enforcement by commissioner -- penalties -- referral to department.
(1) All records and papers of health carriers pertaining to health benefit plans or negotiations between the
health carrier and a health care provider are subject to inspection by the commissioner or by an agent the
commissioner designates for that purpose. The commissioner may require a health carrier to produce a list of
all health care contracts, transactions, or pricing arrangements entered into within the preceding 12 months.
(2) Except for contracts granted a waiver under [section 3], the commissioner may impose an
administrative penalty of up to $5,000 a day on a health carrier for each day that a contract in violation of
[section 2] is in effect.
(3) As provided in 33-16-211, the commissioner may deny the sale of a health insurance plan for
which the contract between the health carrier and any health care provider is in violation of [section 2].
(4) The commissioner may refer a health care contract subject to this section to the department to
review for compliance with [sections 1 through 8]. The referral of a health care contract by the commissioner to
the department does not constitute a violation of any confidentiality agreement between the health carrier and
the commissioner that may exist under 33-16-203. The authority of the department to prosecute violations of
antitrust or consumer protection requirements is not narrowed, abrogated, or otherwise altered by this section.

- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
NEW SECTION. Section 6. Private right of action. A party that suffers a loss as a result of a
violation of [sections 1 through 8] is entitled to initiate an action pursuant to Title 30, chapter 14, part 1, and
seek all remedies, damages, costs, and fees available under 30-14-131.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effect on privacy. (1) Nothing in this section modifies, reduces, or
eliminates the existing privacy protections and standards provided by reason of state and federal law, including
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, the federal Genetic
Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008, Public Law 110-233, and required confidentiality provisions of the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, Public Law 101-336.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit network design or cost or quality initiatives by
a group health plan, a health carrier, or administrators working on behalf of a plan sponsor, including
accountable care organizations, exclusive provider organizations, networks that tier providers by cost or quality
or steer enrollees to centers of excellence, or other pay-for-performance programs.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Rulemaking authority. (1) The department may adopt rules to
implement [sections 2 through 4].
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement [section 5].

Section 9. Section 28-2-724, MCA, is amended to read:
"28-2-724. Prohibition of contracts that restrict practice -- applicability -- exceptions. (1) A
contract that creates or establishes the terms of employment, a partnership, or any other form of professional
relationship with a health care provider described in subsection (2), may not restrict the right of the health care
provider to:
(a) practice or provide services for which the provider is licensed, in any geographic area and for
any period, after the termination of the employment, partnership, or other form of professional relationship;
(b) treat, advise, consult with, or establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of
the employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship; or
(c) solicit or seek to establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of the
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0304.1
employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) apply to contracts or agreements involving the following
health care providers:
(a) a psychiatrist or addiction medicine physician licensed under Title 37, chapter 3 a physician
licensed under Title 37, chapter 3;
(b) a psychologist licensed under Title 37, chapter 17;
(c) a social worker licensed under Title 37, chapter 22 39;
(d) a professional counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 23 39;
(e) an addiction counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 35 39;
(f) a marriage and family therapist licensed under Title 37, chapter 39; 37; and
(g) a behavioral health peer support specialist licensed under Title 37, chapter 38 39; and
(h) a registered professional nurse or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Title
37, chapter 8.
(3) This section does not apply to a contract in connection with the sale and purchase of a
practice."

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 8] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 30, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, apply to [sections
1 through 8].

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Applicability. [This act] applies to contracts or policies issued or
renewed on or after October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – ****